Utah statutes.
13-38-101.   Definitions -- Financial transaction card receipt requirements.
(1)  As used in this chapter:
(a)  "Division" means the Division of Consumer Protection in the Department of
Commerce.
(b) (i)  "Financial transaction card" means any card, code, or other means of
access to a person's account issued to a person that allows the person to
obtain, purchase, or receive any of the following:
(A)  goods;
(B)  services;
(C)  money; or
(D)  anything else of value.
(ii)  "Financial transaction card" includes:
(A)  a credit card;
(B)  a credit plate;
(C)  a bank services card;
(D)  a banking card;
(E)  a check guarantee card;
(F)  a debit card;
(G)  a telephone credit card; and
(H)  a device for access as defined in Section 7-16a-102.
(c)  "Receipt" means any document related to the transaction of business
provided to a person that uses a financial transaction card.
(2)  A person that accepts a financial transaction card for the transaction of
business may not, on a financial transaction card receipt:
(a)  print more than the last five digits of the financial transaction card
account number; or
(b)  print the financial transaction card expiration date.
(3) (a)  This section applies only to receipts that are electronically
printed.
(b)  This section does not apply to transactions in which the initial means of
recording the financial transaction card number is by:
(i)  handwriting; or
(ii)  an imprint or copy of the financial transaction card.
